South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3481.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 13, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-13-265. A licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician may provide services permitted under his or her license on location in a client's home or at an event venue, such as a church, hotel, or similar event venue, when requested by the client and with permission of the venue. The licensed provider shall ensure all equipment is appropriately sanitized when providing services outside of a salon. SECTION 2.  Section 40-13-110(A)(6) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (6) practiced or attempted to practice cosmetology in any place other than a licensed salon, except in case of an emergency including, but not limited to, illness, invalidism, or death when a licensed operator may perform services for a person in another place by appointment onlyReserved; SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----